Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2108
Shares; acquire, sell, assign, or mortgage.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, any person, partnership, limited liability company, or corporation may acquire, hold, sell, assign, transfer, mortgage, pledge, or otherwise dispose of the shares of capital stock of a development corporation created under the Nebraska Business Development Corporation Act, except that insurance companies, reciprocal exchanges, and fraternal benefit societies shall not invest therein other than as provided in the Insurers Investment Act.

Laws 1967, c. 100, § 8, p. 304;

Laws 1991, LB 237, § 56;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 157.

Insurers Investment Act, see section 44-5101.